Oklahoma, session 2025, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5025, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5025. A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority may


establish, with available funds, a reimbursement methodology that


will enhance the reimbursement for services provided to Medicaid


beneficiaries in emergency hospitals in rural areas of the state.


B. The Authority shall establish, with available funds, a


reimbursement methodology for the state Medicaid program that


reimburses for obstetrical care at hospitals designated as Baby-


Friendly by Baby-Friendly USA at a rate equal to the product of the


standard reimbursement rate for obstetrical care at hospitals

Req. No. 479 Page 1


multiplied by a factor of one and one quarter (1 1/4). The


Authority shall seek any federal approval necessary to implement the


provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-479 DC 12/30/2024 4:54:45 PM





























Req. No. 479 Page 2